Utah statutes.
48-1d-305.   Partnership liable for partner's actionable conduct.

(1)  A partnership is liable for loss or injury caused to a person, or for a penalty incurred, as a result of a wrongful act or omission, or other actionable conduct, of a partner acting in the ordinary course of activities and affairs of the partnership or with the actual or apparent authority of the partnership.

(2)  If, in the course of the partnership's activities and affairs or while acting with actual or apparent authority of the partnership, a partner receives or causes the partnership to receive money or property of a person not a partner, and the money or property is misapplied by a partner, the partnership is liable for the loss.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

